Arkansas, session 2025, SB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 66, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 8 — Online Marketplace Guarantees Act

23-66-801. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Online
Marketplace Guarantees Act".

23-66-802. Purposes.
The purpose of this subchapter is to:
(1) Create a legal framework within which an online marketplace
or its affiliates may offer or sell an online marketplace guarantee in this
state;
(2) Protect consumers by promoting transparency, fairness, and
accountability related to online marketplace guarantees and placing the risk
of innovation on the online marketplace providers rather than consumers;
(3) Encourage innovation in the marketing and development of
*ANS141*
03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB329
more economical and effective means of providing an online marketplace
guarantee; and
(4) Permit and encourage fair and effective competition among
different providers.

23-66-803. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Online marketplace" means a person that:
(A) Provides an online application, software, website,
system, or other medium through which a service is advertised or is offered
to the public as available in this state;
(B) Provides, directly or indirectly, or maintains a
platform for services by performing:
(i) Transmitting or otherwise communicating the
offer or acceptance of a transaction between two (2) platform users; or
(ii) Owning or operating the electronic
infrastructure or technology that brings two (2) or more platform users
together;
(C) If engaged in the sale or offering of online
marketplace guarantees, engages only in a manner that is ancillary to the
conduct of its primary legitimate business or activity; and
(D) Provides services not provided as a state or local
government entity or vendor;
(2) "Online marketplace guarantee" means a contract or agreement
issued in connection with an online marketplace, whether or not for a
separate consideration, to guarantee a platform user’s obligation to repair,
replace, or indemnify another platform user for any damages or loss of income
arising out of use of the online marketplace, with or without additional
provision for incidental payment of indemnity;
(3) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
incorporated or unincorporated association, joint stock company, reciprocal,
syndicate, or any similar entity or combination of entities acting in
concert;
(4) "Platform contract holder" means a platform user who is the
beneficiary or holder of an online marketplace guarantee;
(5) "Platform user" means a user of an online marketplace who is
03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB329
subject to the online marketplace’s terms of service;
(6) "Provider" means an online marketplace or an affiliate or
representative of an online marketplace who issues, makes, provides, sells,
or offers to sell as well as administers, either directly or through a third
party, an online marketplace guarantee;
(7) "Reimbursement insurance policy" means a policy of insurance
issued to a provider and under which the insurer agrees, for the benefit of
platform contract holders, to discharge all of the obligations and
liabilities of the provider under the terms of the online marketplace
guarantee in the event of nonperformance by the provider; and
(8)(A) "Separate consideration" means a separately stated
consideration paid to a provider for an online marketplace guarantee that is
paid at the voluntary election of the person purchasing the online
marketplace guarantee.
(B) "Separate consideration" does not include a revenue
sharing agreement between a provider and platform user or any consideration
collected by the online marketplace that is primarily related to the
underlying service provided by the online marketplace.

23-66-804. Requirements for doing business.
(a) An online marketplace guarantee shall not be issued, sold, or
offered for sale in this state unless the provider has:
(1) If sold for separate consideration, provided an electronic
or written record of the purchase of the online marketplace guarantee to the
platform contract holder;
(2) Made the online marketplace guarantee terms available on the
provider’s website; and
(3) Complied with this subchapter.
(b) A provider of online marketplace guarantees sold or offered in
this state shall file a registration with the Insurance Commissioner on a
form and at a fee prescribed by the commissioner.
(c) To ensure the faithful performance of a provider’s obligations to
its platform contract holders, each provider who is obligated to a platform
contract holder shall comply with at least one (1) of the following
requirements:
(1) Insure all online marketplace guarantees under a
03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB329
reimbursement insurance policy issued by an insurer authorized to transact
insurance in this state or issued under § 23-65-308;
(2) For at least thirty (30) days in any ninety-day period,
maintain a market capitalization of at least two hundred million dollars
($200,000,000) on a securities exchange registered as a national securities
exchange or a securities market regulated under the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934, 15 U.S.C. §§ 78 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, as
reported by the national securities exchange at the close of each trading
day; or
(3)(A) Maintain a net cash balance or net worth of at least
fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).
(B) Upon request, the provider or provider’s parent
company shall provide the commissioner with financial statements to support
the net cash balance or net worth as required under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of
this section.
(C) Financial statements may include without limitation:
(i) A Form 10-K or Form S-1 filed with the United
States Securities and Exchange Commission within the last calendar year,
including any amendments; or
(ii) A copy of the company’s audited financial
statements with a reporting date within the last calendar year.
(D) If the provider’s parent company’s financial
statements are provided to meet the provider’s financial stability
requirement, then the parent company shall agree to guarantee the obligations
of the provider relating to online marketplace guarantees sold by the
provider in this state.

23-66-805. Online marketplace guarantees.
(a) Online marketplace guarantees do not constitute insurance and are
not required to comply with the Arkansas Insurance Code other than as
expressly made applicable in this subchapter, provided the provider has
registered with the Insurance Commissioner as required by § 23-66-804.
(b) The following activities by a provider or a provider’s
representative do not constitute the transaction of insurance and are
likewise exempt from any licensing requirements under the Arkansas Insurance
Code:
03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB329
(1) Marketing, providing, selling, or offering to sell online
marketplace guarantees in compliance with this subchapter;
(2) Determining amounts payable under online marketplace
guarantees including, with respect to claims made by platform contract
holders:
(A) Investigating, negotiating, or administering
settlements of claims; or
(B) Applying the factual circumstances of the claim to the
online marketplace guarantee’s terms; or
(3) Collecting separate consideration in connection with online
marketplace guarantees.
(c) A provider may:
(1) Charge separate consideration for an online marketplace
guarantee; and
(2)(A) Provide varying levels of service and functionality
depending on whether a platform user has paid separate consideration.
(B) Any separate consideration collected for online
marketplace guarantees shall not be subject to premium taxes.
(d) This subchapter shall not be construed to limit a provider’s
rights to seek recourse from a platform user to the extent of any contractual
obligation by any means permitted under an online marketplace’s terms of
service.
(e) An online marketplace guarantee may set a minimum threshold amount
of damages that limit amounts payable to a platform contract holder if the
minimum threshold amount is disclosed under § 23-66-807(e).

23-66-806. Reimbursement insurance policy.
(a) A reimbursement insurance policy insuring online marketplace
guarantees sold or offered in this state shall clearly state that, upon
failure of the provider to perform under the online marketplace guarantee,
the insurer that issued the policy shall pay on behalf of the provider any
sums the provider is obligated to pay according to such online marketplace
guarantee.
(b)(1) A reimbursement insurance policy is subject to the laws and
rules governing termination and nonrenewal of an insurance policy in this
state.
03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB329
(2) The termination of a reimbursement insurance policy shall
not reduce the issuer’s responsibility for online marketplace guarantees
issued by providers before the effective date of the termination.
(c)(1) For purposes of § 23-64-207, a provider is considered to be the
agent of the insurer which issued the reimbursement insurance policy.
(2) The insurer retains the right to seek indemnification or
subrogation from the provider if the insurer pays or is obligated to pay sums
to the platform contract holder that the provider was obligated to pay under
the online marketplace guarantee.
(3) This subchapter does not prevent or limit the insurer's
right in this regard.

23-66-807. Consumer protection disclosures.
(a) An online marketplace guarantee issued, sold, or offered for sale
in this state shall be written in clear, understandable language and
conspicuously disclose the requirements in this section, as applicable.
(b) An online marketplace guarantee insured under a reimbursement
insurance policy under § 23-66-804(c)(1) shall contain a statement in
substantially the following form:
“Obligations of the provider under this online marketplace guarantee are
guaranteed under a reimbursement insurance policy. If the provider fails to
pay or provide service on a claim within one hundred eighty (180) days after
proof of loss has been filed, the platform contract holder is entitled to
make a claim directly against the insurance company subject to the terms of
the policy.”
(c) An online marketplace guarantee not insured under a reimbursement
insurance policy under § 23-66-804(c)(1) shall contain a statement in
substantially the following form:
“Obligations of the provider under this online marketplace guarantee are not
covered under a reimbursement insurance policy and are backed only by the
provider (issuer).”
(d) If sold for separate consideration, online marketplace guarantees
shall conspicuously state the total purchase price and the terms under which
the online marketplace guarantee is sold before the sale.
(e) An online marketplace guarantee shall:
(1) Identify each provider obligated to provide payment for
03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB329
claims under the contract or otherwise involved in the contract’s issuance or
sale;
(2) Conspicuously state the existence and amount of any damage
recovery minimum threshold;
(3) Specify the services to be provided and any limitations,
exceptions, or exclusions;
(4)(A) State any terms, restrictions, or conditions, including
conditions governing transferability or conditions governing termination of
the online marketplace guarantees by the platform contract holder.
(B) The provider of the online marketplace guarantee shall
mail or email a written notice to the platform contract holder within thirty
(30) days of the date of termination under subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this
section; and
(5) Include a statement in substantially the following form:
“This agreement is not an insurance contract.”
(f) An online marketplace guarantee sold for separate consideration
shall clearly and conspicuously state, at the time of sale, the applicable
cancellation and refund policy.

23-66-808. Prohibited acts.
(a) A provider shall not make, permit, or cause to be made any false
or misleading statement or deliberately omit any material statement that
would be considered misleading if omitted in connection with the sale, offer
to sell, or advertisement of an online marketplace guarantee.
(b) If an online marketplace guarantee is offered for separate
consideration, a provider shall not require the purchase of an online
marketplace guarantee as a condition of the use of the online marketplace’s
platform.

23-66-809. Enforcement provisions.
(a) When necessary or appropriate to enforce this subchapter and the
Insurance Commissioner’s rules and orders and to protect platform contract
holders in this state, the commissioner may take action under § 23-61-103.
(b)(1) An online marketplace aggrieved by an order issued under this
section may request a hearing before the commissioner under § 23-61-303.
(2) Pending a hearing requested under subdivision (b)(1) of this
03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB329
section and the decision by the commissioner, the commissioner shall suspend
the effective date of any order.

23-66-810. Rules.
The Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules to implement and
administer this subchapter including rules related to recordkeeping by a
provider.

23-66-811. Severability.
If a provision of this subchapter or the application of this subchapter
to a person or circumstances shall be held invalid, the remainder of this
subchapter and the application of this subchapter to a person or
circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid shall not be
affected.

/s/J. Boyd




















03-10-2025 13:50:41 ANS141